Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1537.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-114, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-114. Surcharge on court authorized diversion programs for traffic offenses; deposit A. If a court authorizes individuals charged with civil or criminal traffic offenses to attend a court authorized diversion program, including a defensive driving school program, it shall require the assessment of a nine dollar $9 surcharge on the fees charged by the court authorized diversion programs.  The surcharge applies to every individual who attends a court authorized diversion program, including an individual who holds a commercial driver license. B. A court or a court authorized diversion program shall collect the nine dollar $9 surcharge and remit the surcharge to the supreme court, which shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, five dollars $5 of the surcharge in the judicial collection enhancement fund and the remaining four dollars $4 in the peace officer training equipment fund public safety DE-ESCALATION and life safety fund established by section 41-1731. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 12-116.10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-116.10. Assessment; public safety de-escalation and life safety fund A. In addition to any other penalty assessment provided by law, a penalty assessment shall be levied in an amount of four dollars $4 on every civil penalty imposed and collected for a civil traffic violation and fine, penalty or forfeiture for a criminal violation of the motor vehicle statutes or for any local ordinance relating to the stopping, standing or operation of a vehicle. B. The court shall transmit the assessments collected pursuant to this section and a remittance report of the fines, civil penalties and forfeitures collected pursuant to this section to the county treasurer, except that municipal courts shall transmit the assessments and the remittance report of the fines, civil penalties and forfeitures to the city or town treasurer. C. The city, town or county treasurer shall transmit the assessment and the remittance report to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the assessment in the peace officer training equipment fund Public safety de-escalation and life safety fund established by section 41-1731. D. The court may mitigate all or part of the assessment in the same manner and subject to the same limitations in the mitigation of a fine in section 13-825, subsection B. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 41-1731, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1731. Public safety de-escalation and life safety fund; exemptions A. The peace officer training equipment public safety de-escalation and life safety fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to sections 12-114 and 12-116.10. The state treasurer shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund may be used only for peace officer equipment. B. The state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. C. Monies in the fund: 1. Do not revert to the state general fund at the end of the fiscal year. 2. Are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. 3. Are subject to legislative appropriation. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Repeal Section 41-1732, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed.